Wyoming, session 2026, HB0019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-3-303 by creating a new subsection
(d) and 23-3-305(b) are amended to read:

6-3-303. Criminal trespass; penalties.

(d) For purposes of this section, a person does not
commit criminal trespass if the person is traveling from
HB0019

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0118
one (1) parcel of land owned by a local government, the
state of Wyoming or the federal government that the person
is authorized to access to another parcel of land owned by
a local government, the state of Wyoming or federal
government that the person is authorized to access at the
corner where the two (2) parcels meet and without causing
damage to any privately owned land adjacent to the two (2)
parcels.

23-3-305. Hunting from highway; entering or traveling
through private property without permission; penalty;
hunting at night without permission prohibited.

(b) No person shall enter upon, travel through or
return across the private property of any person to take
wildlife, hunt, fish, collect antlers or horns, or trap
without the permission of the owner or person in charge of
the property. Violation of this subsection constitutes a
low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S.
23-6-202(a)(v). For purposes of this subsection:

HB0019

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0118
(i) "Travel through or return across" requires
physically touching or driving on the surface of the
private property;

(ii) A person does not commit trespass under
this subsection if the person is traveling from one (1)
parcel of land owned by a local government, the state of
Wyoming or the federal government that the person is
authorized to access to another parcel of land owned by a
local government, the state of Wyoming or federal
government that the person is authorized to access at the
corner where the two (2) parcels meet and without causing
damage to any privately owned land adjacent to the two (2)
parcels.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0019